Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,107
Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program; services eligible for reimbursement.

Services eligible for reimbursement for at-risk mothers under the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program include, but are not limited to: (1) Six or fewer sessions of nutrition counseling; (2) psychosocial counseling and support; (3) general client education and health promotion; (4) a minimum of two breastfeeding support sessions; and (5) targeted case management.

Laws 2024, LB857, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB958, § 6.
July 18, 2026